New Jersey, session 222, A1881.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   As used in this act: Child means a person less than 18 years of age. Halloween costume means a costume, garment, article of clothing, or fashion of dress appropriate to, marketed for, or intended for use on Halloween. Reflective material means reflective tape, fabric, decorative patches or other material that is highly visible in low light. b.    (1)  A person shall not sell or offer for sale a Halloween costume intended for use by a child that does not have reflective material attached to, or packaged and sold with, the costume. (2)   A person in violation of paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be subject to a penalty of not more than $500 for the first offense and not more than $1,000 for each subsequent offense, to be collected in a civil action by a summary proceeding under the Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999, P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to childrens Halloween costumers sold on or after November 15 next following the date of enactment.